District of Columbia statutes.
48-841.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Off-Label Informed Consent Act of 2008”.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 201, 55 DCR 1659

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 17-131, the SafeRX Amendment Act of 2008, see Mayor’s Order 2008-94, July 3, 2008 ( 55 DCR 9375).